Utah statutes.
32B-7-201.   State and local licensing -- Limitations.

(1)  Subject to the other provisions of this title, a local authority may:

(a)  tax or prohibit the retail sale of beer;

(b)  subject to this part, issue, suspend, and revoke a local license to sell beer at retail for off-premise consumption;

(c)  establish proximity requirements for establishing premises where beer is sold at retail for off-premise consumption in relation to any community location; and

(d)  otherwise regulate the retail sale of beer for off-premise consumption subject to the requirements of Section 32B-7-202 and Part 3, Off-premise Beer Retailer Enforcement Act.

(2)  A local authority may not issue to a minor a local license to sell beer at retail for off-premise consumption.

